Nebraska, session 109, LB776.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB776 LB776
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) Each year beginning January 1, 2027, each state
agency shall examine any fee charged and determine whether the fee is
sufficient, but not exceeding the amount necessary, to cover costs that
are intended to be covered by the fee.
(2) For purposes of this section, state agency means any department,
agency, board, bureau, or commission of the state.
-2-